Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2044.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.155, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Appropriation. (a) Money in the general portion of the remediation fund is appropriated to deleted text begin the agency anddeleted text end the commissioners of agriculture deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end natural resourcesnew text begin , and the Pollution Control Agencynew text end for the following purposes: (1) to take actions related to releases of hazardous substances, or pollutants or contaminants as provided in section 115B.20; (2) to take actions related to releases of hazardous substances, or pollutants or contaminants, at and from qualified landfill facilities as provided in section 115B.42, subdivision 2; (3) to provide technical and other assistance under sections 115B.17, subdivision 14, 115B.175 to 115B.179, and 115C.03, subdivision 9; (4) for corrective actions to address incidents involving agricultural chemicals, including related administrative, enforcement, and cost recovery actions pursuant to chapter 18D; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (5) together with any amount approved for transfer to the agency from the petroleum tank fund by the commissioner of management and budget, to take actions related to releases of petroleum as provided under section 115C.08deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (6) notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency to reimburse the owner and operator of an emergency response training center for costs incurred to address contamination of PFAS, as defined in section 116.943, arising from or associated with the use of firefighting foam at the training center, so long as the use of PFAS-containing firefighting foam stopped at the training center on or before January 1, 2015. Under this clause, the commissioner may reimburse costs incurred on or after January 1, 2023, for or related to: new text end new text begin (i) an approved investigation work plan and other investigation, response, removal, remediation, and monitoring efforts; new text end new text begin (ii) planning, legal, fiscal, economic, engineering, or architectural studies or other studies, investigation, or actions; or new text end new text begin (iii) any other necessary or appropriate activities approved by the commissioner. new text end (b) The commissioner of management and budget deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end allocate the amounts available in any biennium to deleted text begin the agency, anddeleted text end the commissioners of agriculture deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end natural resourcesnew text begin , and the Pollution Control Agencynew text end for the purposes provided in this subdivision based upon work plans submitted by deleted text begin the agency anddeleted text end the commissioners of agriculture deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end natural resources, new text begin and the Pollution Control Agency new text end and may adjust those allocations upon submittal of revised work plans. Copies of the work plans deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be submitted to the chairs of the senate and house of representatives committees having jurisdiction over environment and environment finance. Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; EMERGENCY RESPONSE TRAINING CENTER.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the environmental fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for grants to state colleges or universities that are eligible to be reimbursed for costs under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.155, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (6), that were incurred on or after January 1, 2023. In awarding grants under this section, the commissioner must give preference to a state college or university that has enrolled as a cooperative responsible party in the agency's remediation program. new text end